Maine, session 132, LD121.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §2263, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2021, c. 510, §2, is further
amended to read:
2. Litter. "Litter" means all waste materials including, but not limited to, bottles,;
glass,; crockery,; cans,; scrap metal,; junk,; paper,; garbage,; rubbish,; brush and yard
debris; offal, except waste parts or remains resulting from the normal field dressing of
lawfully harvested wild game or the lawful use of waste parts or remains of wild game as
bait,; feathers, except feathers from live birds while being transported,; abandoned ice-
fishing shacks,; old automobiles or parts of automobiles or similar refuse,; or disposable
packages or containers thrown or deposited as prohibited in this chapter, but not including
the wastes of the primary processes of mining, logging, sawmilling, farming or
manufacturing. "Litter" includes waste materials resulting from or associated with the use
of tobacco products, including, but not limited to, cigarette butts,; all waste materials
resulting from the outdoor release or abandonment of a balloon; and all waste materials
resulting from the use of consumer fireworks.
For the purposes of this subsection, "tobacco product" has the same meaning as in Title 22,
section 1551, subsection 3 and "consumer fireworks" has the same meaning as in Title 8,
section 221‑A, subsection 1‑A.
For the purposes of this subsection, "brush and yard debris" does not include slash, as
defined in Title 12, section 9331, generated by or on behalf of a public utility, as defined
in Title 35-A, section 102, subsection 13.
Sec. 2. 17 MRSA §2263-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2021, c. 374, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Prohibited acts. A person may not intentionally throw, drop, deposit, discard,
dump or otherwise dispose of litter in any manner or amount:
A. In or on public highway, road, street, alley, public right-of-way or other public
lands, except in a container or receptacle or on property that is designated for disposal
of garbage and refuse by the State or its agencies or political subdivisions;
Page 1 - 132LR0479(03)

B. In freshwater lake, river, stream, tidal or coastal water or on ice over the water.
When any litter is thrown or discarded from a watercraft, a person is in violation of this
section if that person is:
(1) The operator of the watercraft, unless it is a watercraft being used for the
carriage of passengers for hire; or
(2) The person actually disposing of the litter.
This paragraph does not prohibit persons who fish, lobster or otherwise harvest from
the water from returning to the water harvested products, bait and similar materials that
naturally originate in the water;
C. In or on any private property, unless:
(1) Prior consent of the owner has been given; and
(2) The litter is not a public nuisance or in violation of any state law or local rule;
D. From a trailer or vehicle that is constructed, loaded or uncovered in such a way that
the load may drop, sift, leak or otherwise escape. This paragraph applies to vehicles
or trailers carrying trash, rubbish or other materials that may be construed as "litter";
or
E. From a vehicle. When any litter is thrown or discarded from a vehicle, a person is
in violation of this section if that person is:
(1) The operator of the vehicle, unless it is a vehicle being used for the carriage of
passengers for hire; or
(2) The person actually disposing of the litter.
It is a violation of this chapter for a person to intentionally release outdoors a balloon that
is inflated or filled with a gas that is lighter than air, except that it is not a violation of this
chapter for a person to intentionally release outdoors a balloon carrying scientific
instrumentation, a balloon used for meteorological observation by a governmental or
scientific organization or a hot air balloon that is recovered after launching.
In addition to any penalty under section 2264‑A, violation of this subsection is a traffic
infraction under Title 29‑A, chapter 23, subchapter VI 6.
A record of a violation of this subsection must be forwarded to the Secretary of State who,
in accordance with Title 29‑A, section 2607, shall add the violation to the department's
point system. The violation is counted in determining an individual's total points under the
point system of the Department of the Secretary of State, Bureau of Motor Vehicles.
Page 2 - 132LR0479(03)